Maryland, session 2026, SB0494.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–101.
In this subtitle, “Commission” means the Maryland Health Care Commission.
19–114.
(a) In this Part II of this subtitle the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(a–1) “Acquisition” means:
(1) A transfer of stock or assets that results in a change of the person that
controls a health care facility; or
(2) The transfer of more than 25% of stock or ownership interest in a health
care facility.
(b) “Ambulatory surgical facility” means any center, service, office, facility, or
office of one or more health care practitioners or a group practice that:
(1) Has three or more operating rooms;
(2) Operates primarily for the purpose of providing surgical services to
patients who do not require overnight hospitalization; and
(3) Seeks reimbursement from payors as an ambulatory surgical facility.
(c) “Certificate of need” means a certification of public need issued by the
Commission under this Part II of this subtitle for a health care project.
(D) “CONSOLIDATION” MEANS THE CONSOLIDATION OR RELOCATION OF
BEDS AND HEALTH CARE SERVICES BETWEEN HEALTH CARE FACILITIES WITHIN THE
SAME MERGED ASSET SYSTEM.
(E) “EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR” MEANS THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE
COMMISSION.
[(d)] (F) (1) “Health care facility” means:
(i) A hospital, as defined in § 19–301 of this title;

SENATE BILL 494 3
(ii) A limited service hospital, as defined in § 19–301 of this title;
(iii) A related institution, as defined in § 19–301 of this title;
(iv) An ambulatory surgical facility;
(v) An inpatient facility that is organized primarily to help in the
rehabilitation of disabled individuals, through an integrated program of medical and other
services provided under competent professional supervision;
(vi) A home health agency, as defined in § 19–401 of this title;
(vii) A hospice, as defined in § 19–901 of this title;
(viii) A freestanding medical facility, as defined in § 19–3A–01 of this
title; and
(ix) Any other health institution, service, or program for which this
Part II of this subtitle requires a certificate of need.
(2) “Health care facility” does not include:
(i) A hospital or related institution that is operated, or is listed and
certified, by the First Church of Christ Scientist, Boston, Massachusetts;
(ii) For the purpose of providing an exception to the requirement for
a certificate of need under § 19–120 of this subtitle, a facility to provide comprehensive care
constructed by a provider of continuing care, as defined in § 10–401 of the Human Services
Article, if:
1. Except as provided under § 19–123 of this subtitle, the
facility is for the exclusive use of the provider’s subscribers who have executed continuing
care agreements, including continuing care at home agreements, and paid entrance fees
that are at least equal to the lowest entrance fee charged for an independent living unit, an
assisted living unit, or a continuing care at home agreement before entering the continuing
care community, regardless of the level of care needed by the subscribers at the time of
admission;
2. The facility is located on the campus of the continuing care
community; and
3. The number of comprehensive care nursing beds in the
community does not exceed:
A. 24 percent of the number of independent living units in a
community having less than 300 independent living units; or

SENATE BILL 494
B. 20 percent of the number of independent living units in a
community having 300 or more independent living units;
(iii) For the purpose of providing an exception to the requirement for
a certificate of need under § 19–120 of this subtitle, a facility to provide comprehensive care
that:
1. Is owned and operated by the Maryland Department of
Veterans and Military Families; and
2. Restricts admissions to individuals who meet the
residency requirements established by the Maryland Department of Veterans and Military
Families and are:
A. Veterans who were discharged or released from the
uniformed services under honorable conditions;
B. Former members of a reserve component, as defined in §
9–901 of the State Government Article; or
C. Nonveteran spouses of eligible veterans;
(iv) Except for a facility to provide kidney transplant services or
programs, a kidney disease treatment facility, as defined by rule or regulation of the United
States Department of Health and Human Services;
(v) Except for kidney transplant services or programs, the kidney
disease treatment stations and services provided by or on behalf of a hospital or related
institution; or
(vi) The office of one or more individuals licensed to practice dentistry
under Title 4 of the Health Occupations Article, for the purposes of practicing dentistry.
[(e)] (G) “Health care practitioner” means any individual who is licensed,
certified, or otherwise authorized under the Health Occupations Article to provide health
care services.
[(f)] (H) “Health service area” means an area of this State that the Governor
designates as appropriate for planning and developing of health services.
[(g)] (I) “Local health planning agency” means the health department of a
jurisdiction or a body designated by the local health department to perform health planning
functions.
[(h)] (J) “State health plan” means the State health plan for facilities and
services.

SENATE BILL 494 5
19–120.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Consolidation” [and “merger” include] INCLUDES increases and
decreases in bed capacity or services among the components of an organization that:
(i) Operates more than one health care facility; or
(ii) Operates one or more health care facilities and holds an
outstanding certificate of need to construct a health care facility.
(h) (1) A certificate of need is required before the bed capacity of a health care
facility is changed.
(2) This subsection does not apply to any increase or decrease in bed
capacity if:
(iii) 1. At least 45 days before increasing or decreasing bed
capacity, written notice of intent to change bed capacity is filed with the Commission;
2. The Commission in its sole discretion finds that the
proposed change:
A. Is pursuant to the consolidation [or merger] of two or more
health care facilities, or conversion of a health care facility or part of a facility to a
nonhealth–related use;
B. Is not inconsistent with the State health plan or the
institution–specific plan developed by the Commission;
C. Will result in the delivery of more efficient and effective
health care services; and
D. Is in the public interest; and
3. Within 45 days of receiving notice, the Commission
notifies the health care facility of its finding;
(j) (1) A certificate of need is required before the type or scope of any health
care service is changed if the health care service:
(i) Is offered:
1. By a health care facility;
2. In space that is leased from a health care facility; or

SENATE BILL 494
3. In space that is on land leased from a health care facility;
or
(ii) Results in a change in operating room capacity in a hospital, a
freestanding medical facility, or an ambulatory surgical facility.
(2) This subsection does not apply if:
(i) The Commission adopts limits for changes in health care services
and the proposed change would not exceed those limits;
(ii) The proposed change and the annual operating revenue that
would result from the addition is entirely associated with the use of medical equipment;
(iii) The proposed change would establish, increase, or decrease a
health care service and the change would not result in the:
1. Establishment of a new medical service or elimination of
an existing medical service;
2. Establishment of a cardiac surgery, organ transplant
surgery, or burn or neonatal intensive health care service;
3. Except as provided in § 19–120.1 of this subtitle,
establishment of percutaneous coronary intervention services;
4. Establishment of a home health program, hospice
program, or freestanding ambulatory surgical center or facility; or
5. Expansion of a comprehensive care, extended care,
intermediate care, residential treatment, psychiatry, or rehabilitation medical service,
except for an expansion related to an increase in total bed capacity in accordance with
subsection (h)(2)(i) of this section; or
(iv) 1. At least 45 days before increasing or decreasing the
volume of one or more health care services, written notice of intent to change the volume of
health care services is filed with the Commission;
2. The Commission in its sole discretion finds that the
proposed change:
A. Is pursuant to:
I. The consolidation [or merger] of two or more health care
facilities;

SENATE BILL 494 7
II. The conversion of a health care facility or part of a facility
to a nonhealth–related use;
III. The conversion of a hospital to a limited service hospital;
or
IV. The conversion of a licensed general hospital to a
freestanding medical facility in accordance with subsection (o)(3) of this section;
B. Is not inconsistent with the State health plan or the
institution–specific plan developed and adopted by the Commission;
C. Will result in the delivery of more efficient and effective
health care services; and
D. Is in the public interest; and
3. Within 45 days of receiving notice under item 1 of this
item, the Commission notifies the health care facility of its finding.
(k) (1) A certificate of need is required before any of the following capital
expenditures are made by or on behalf of a hospital:
(i) Any expenditure that, under generally accepted accounting
principles, is not properly chargeable as an operating or maintenance expense, if:
1. The expenditure is made as part of an acquisition,
improvement, or expansion, and, after adjustment for inflation as provided in the
regulations of the Commission, the total expenditure, including the cost of each study,
survey, design, plan, working drawing, specification, and other essential activity, is more
than the hospital capital threshold;
2. The expenditure is made as part of a replacement of any
plant and equipment of the hospital and is more than the hospital capital threshold after
adjustment for inflation as provided in the regulations of the Commission;
3. The expenditure results in a substantial change in the bed
capacity of the hospital; or
4. The expenditure results in the establishment of a new
medical service in a hospital that would require a certificate of need under subsection (i) of
this section; or
(ii) Any expenditure that is made to lease or, by comparable
arrangement, obtain any plant or equipment for the hospital, if:

SENATE BILL 494
1. The expenditure is made as part of an acquisition,
improvement, or expansion, and the total expenditure, including the cost of each study,
survey, design, plan, working drawing, specification, and other essential activity, is more
than the hospital capital threshold;
2. The expenditure is made as part of a replacement of any
plant and equipment and is more than the hospital capital threshold after adjustment for
inflation as provided in the regulations of the Commission;
3. The expenditure results in a substantial change in the bed
capacity of the hospital; or
4. The expenditure results in the establishment of a new
medical service in a hospital that would require a certificate of need under subsection (i) of
this section.
(6) This subsection does not apply to:
(v) A capital expenditure made as part of a consolidation or merger
of two or more health care facilities, or conversion of a health care facility or part of a facility
to a nonhealth–related use if:
1. At least 45 days before an expenditure is made, written
notice of intent is filed with the Commission;
2. Within 45 days of receiving notice, the Commission in its
sole discretion finds that the proposed consolidation[, merger,] or conversion:
A. Is not inconsistent with the State health plan or the
institution–specific plan developed by the Commission as appropriate;
B. Will result in the delivery of more efficient and effective
health care services; and
C. Is in the public interest; and
3. Within 45 days of receiving notice, the Commission
notifies the health care facility of its finding;
19–120.3.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “HEALTH CARE ENTITY” MEANS:

SENATE BILL 494 9
(I) A HEALTH CARE FACILITY;
(II) AN AMBULATORY SURGICAL FACILITY, AS DEFINED IN §
19–3B–01 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(III) A PROVIDER ORGANIZATION.
(3) (I) “HEALTH CARE FACILITY” MEANS:
1. A HOSPITAL, AS DEFINED IN § 19–301 OF THIS TITLE;
2. A LIMITED SERVICE HOSPITAL, AS DEFINED IN §
19–301 OF THIS TITLE;
3. A RELATED INSTITUTION, AS DEFINED IN § 19–301 OF
THIS TITLE;
4. AN AMBULATORY SURGICAL FACILITY;
5. AN INPATIENT FACILITY THAT IS ORGANIZED
PRIMARILY TO HELP IN THE REHABILITATION OF DISABLED INDIVIDUALS, THROUGH
AN INTEGRATED PROGRAM OF MEDICAL AND OTHER SERVICES PROVIDED UNDER
COMPETENT PROFESSIONAL SUPERVISION;
6. A HOME HEALTH AGENCY, AS DEFINED IN § 19–401 OF
THIS TITLE;
7. A HOSPICE, AS DEFINED IN § 19–901 OF THIS TITLE;
8. A FREESTANDING MEDICAL FACILITY, AS DEFINED IN
§ 19–3A–01 OF THIS TITLE; AND
9. ANY OTHER HEALTH INSTITUTION, SERVICE, OR
PROGRAM FOR WHICH THIS PART II OF THIS SUBTITLE REQUIRES A CERTIFICATE
OF NEED.
(II) “HEALTH CARE FACILITY” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. AN ACUTE GENERAL HOSPITAL;
2. A HOSPITAL OR RELATED INSTITUTION THAT IS
OPERATED, OR IS LISTED AND CERTIFIED, BY THE FIRST CHURCH OF CHRIST
SCIENTIST, BOSTON, MASSACHUSETTS;

SENATE BILL 494
3. EXCEPT FOR A FACILITY TO PROVIDE KIDNEY
TRANSPLANT SERVICES OR PROGRAMS, A KIDNEY DISEASE TREATMENT FACILITY,
AS DEFINED BY RULE OR REGULATION OF THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES;
4. EXCEPT FOR KIDNEY TRANSPLANT SERVICES OR
PROGRAMS, THE KIDNEY DISEASE TREATMENT STATIONS AND SERVICES PROVIDED
BY OR ON BEHALF OF A HOSPITAL OR RELATED INSTITUTION; OR
5. THE OFFICE OF ONE OR MORE INDIVIDUALS
LICENSED TO PRACTICE DENTISTRY UNDER TITLE 4 OF THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS
ARTICLE, FOR THE PURPOSES OF PRACTICING DENTISTRY.
(4) “MARKET POWER” MEANS POSSESSING 30% OR MORE MARKET
SHARE IN ANY LINE OF SERVICE IN THE RELEVANT GEOGRAPHIC AREA OR UNDER
OTHER CRITERIA THAT THE COMMISSION MAY DEFINE BY REGULATION.
(5) (I) “MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION” MEANS ANY OF THE
FOLLOWING EVENTS OCCURRING DURING A SINGLE TRANSACTION OR IN A SERIES
OF RELATED TRANSACTIONS WITHIN A CONSECUTIVE 5–YEAR PERIOD INVOLVING A
HEALTH CARE ENTITY THAT HAS TOTAL ASSETS, ANNUAL REVENUES, OR
ANTICIPATED ANNUAL REVENUES IF THE RESULT OF THE TRANSACTION IS A NEW
HEALTH CARE ENTITY, OF AT LEAST $10,000,000, INCLUDING BOTH IN–STATE AND
OUT–OF–STATE ASSETS AND REVENUES:
1. A MERGER INCLUDING ONE OR MORE HEALTH CARE
ENTITIES;
2. AN ACQUISITION OF A HEALTH CARE ENTITY;
3. ANY AFFILIATION, ARRANGEMENT, OR CONTRACT
THAT RESULTS IN A CHANGE OF CONTROL OVER A HEALTH CARE ENTITY;
4. THE FORMATION OF A PARTNERSHIP, JOINT
VENTURE, PARENT ORGANIZATION, OR MANAGEMENT SERVICES ORGANIZATION
FOR THE PURPOSE OF ADMINISTERING CONTRACTS WITH CARRIERS, THIRD–PARTY
ADMINISTRATORS, PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGERS, OR PROVIDERS;
5. A SALE, PURCHASE, LEASE, AFFILIATION, OR
TRANSFER OF CONTROL OF A BOARD OF DIRECTORS OR GOVERNING BODY OF A
HEALTH CARE ENTITY; OR

SENATE BILL 494 11
6. A REAL ESTATE SALE OR LEASE AGREEMENT
INVOLVING A MATERIAL AMOUNT OF ASSETS OF A HEALTH CARE ENTITY.
(II) “MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. AN ACQUISITION OF A NURSING HOME;
2. A CLINICAL AFFILIATION OF HEALTH CARE ENTITIES
FORMED SOLELY FOR THE PURPOSE OF COLLABORATING ON CLINICAL TRIALS;
3. GRADUATE MEDICAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS;
4. THE MERE OFFER OF EMPLOYMENT TO, OR HIRING
OF, A SINGLE PHYSICIAN; OR
5. INSTANCES IN WHICH THE HEALTH CARE ENTITY
DIRECTLY, OR INDIRECTLY THROUGH ONE OR MORE INTERMEDIARIES, ALREADY
CONTROLS, IS CONTROLLED BY, OR IS UNDER COMMON CONTROL WITH, ALL OTHER
PARTIES TO THE TRANSACTION, SUCH AS A CORPORATE RESTRUCTURING.
(6) (I) “PROVIDER ORGANIZATION” MEANS A PERSON THAT IS IN
THE BUSINESS OF HEALTH CARE DELIVERY OR MANAGEMENT, WHETHER
INCORPORATED OR NOT, THAT REPRESENTS ONE OR MORE HEALTH CARE
PRACTITIONERS IN CONTRACTING WITH PAYORS FOR THE PAYMENTS OF HEALTH
CARE SERVICES.
(II) “PROVIDER ORGANIZATION” INCLUDES:
1. A PHYSICIAN ORGANIZATION;
2. A MEDICAL GROUP PRACTICE;
3. AN INDEPENDENT PRACTICE ASSOCIATION;
4. A PROVIDER NETWORK;
5. A MANAGEMENT SERVICES ORGANIZATION; AND
6. ANY OTHER ORGANIZATION THAT CONTRACTS WITH
PAYORS FOR PAYMENT FOR HEALTH CARE SERVICES.

SENATE BILL 494
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY IF THE MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION INVOLVES CHANGES THAT WOULD REQUIRE A CERTIFICATE OF NEED
OR OTHER COMMISSION APPROVAL UNDER § 19–120 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO:
(1) IMPAIR, MODIFY, LIMIT, OR SUPERSEDE THE APPLICABILITY OF
ANY OTHER LICENSE OR APPROVAL REQUIRED UNDER LAW; OR
(2) LIMIT THE AUTHORITY OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL TO PROTECT
THE HEALTH CARE MARKET OR CONSUMERS UNDER ANY OTHER LAW.
(D) (1) AT LEAST 90 DAYS BEFORE COMPLETING A MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION, A HEALTH CARE ENTITY SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE OF THE MATERIAL
CHANGE TRANSACTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE
COMMISSION TO:
(I) THE COMMISSION; AND
(II) THE PUBLIC.
(2) THE NOTICES REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION ARE
COMPLETE WHEN THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR DETERMINES THAT ALL REQUIRED
INFORMATION HAS BEEN DISCLOSED BY THE HEALTH CARE ENTITY.
(E) WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING COMPLETE NOTICE OF A MATERIAL
CHANGE TRANSACTION UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION SHALL POST ON A PUBLICLY AVAILABLE WEBSITE INFORMATION
ABOUT THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION, INCLUDING:
(1) THE IDENTITY OF THE PARTIES TO THE MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION;
(2) A SUMMARY OF THE PROPOSED MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION;
(3) AN EXPLANATION OF THE GROUPS OR INDIVIDUALS LIKELY TO BE
IMPACTED BY THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION;
(4) INFORMATION ABOUT:
(I) SERVICES CURRENTLY PROVIDED BY THE HEALTH CARE
ENTITY;

SENATE BILL 494 13
(II) COMMITMENTS BY THE HEALTH CARE ENTITY TO CONTINUE
THE SERVICES; AND
(III) ANY SERVICES THAT WILL BE REDUCED OR ELIMINATED;
AND
(5) ANY OTHER INFORMATION FROM THE NOTICE AND OTHER
MATERIALS SUBMITTED BY THE HEALTH CARE ENTITY THAT THE COMMISSION
DETERMINES WOULD BE IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST.
(F) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING A COMPLETE NOTICE OF A
MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL:
(1) NOTIFY THE HEALTH CARE ENTITY THAT THE MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION IS NOT SUBJECT TO A PUBLIC INTEREST REVIEW; OR
(2) NOTIFY THE HEALTH CARE ENTITY THAT THE MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION IS SUBJECT TO A PUBLIC INTEREST REVIEW AND REQUEST
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION NECESSARY FOR THE REVIEW.
(G) IN DETERMINING WHETHER TO CONDUCT A PUBLIC INTEREST REVIEW
OF A MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION, THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL
CONSIDER WHETHER:
(1) THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION WILL RESULT IN THE
TRANSFER OF ASSETS THAT EXCEEDS THE THRESHOLD ESTABLISHED BY THE
COMMISSION IN REGULATIONS;
(2) THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION WILL OCCUR IN A
CONSOLIDATED MARKET FOR A LINE OF SERVICES OFFERED BY A PARTY TO THE
MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION;
(3) THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION WILL CAUSE A CHANGE IN
MARKET SHARE, SUCH THAT ANY RESULTING HEALTH CARE ENTITY WILL POSSESS
MARKET POWER ON COMPLETION OF THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION;
(4) THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION WILL OTHERWISE LESSEN
COMPETITION, INCLUDING THROUGH THE EFFECTS OF VERTICAL OR
CROSS–MARKET TRANSACTIONS AMONG DIFFERENT PRODUCT OR GEOGRAPHIC
MARKETS;

SENATE BILL 494
(5) A PARTY TO THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION POSSESSES
MARKET POWER PRIOR TO THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION; AND
(6) THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION IS LIKELY TO HAVE A
NEGATIVE IMPACT ON THE COST, QUALITY, EQUITY, OR ACCESS TO HEALTH CARE
SERVICES IN ANY REGION IN THE STATE.
(H) (1) IF THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR DETERMINES THAT A MATERIAL
CHANGE TRANSACTION IS SUBJECT TO PUBLIC INTEREST REVIEW, THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR SHALL ASSESS THE POTENTIAL IMPACT OF THE MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION ON THE PUBLIC INTEREST.
(2) WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER PROVIDING NOTICE THAT A PUBLIC
INTEREST REVIEW WILL BE CONDUCTED AND RECEIPT OF COMPLETE
INFORMATION, THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL:
(I) APPROVE THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION;
(II) APPROVE THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION WITH
CONDITIONS; OR
(III) DENY THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION.
(3) IN CONDUCTING A PUBLIC INTEREST REVIEW UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR MAY:
(I) CONSULT WITH ANY OTHER FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY;
(II) SOLICIT AND CONSIDER COMMENTS BY EMPLOYEES OF THE
HEALTH CARE ENTITY OR OTHER PARTIES TO THE MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION;
(III) CONSIDER COMMENTS SUBMITTED BY THE PUBLIC; AND
(IV) CONTRACT WITH EXPERTS OR CONSULTANTS
INDEPENDENT OF THE COMMISSION AS NECESSARY TO ASSIST THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR IN CONDUCTING THE ANALYSIS OF A PROPOSED MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION.
(4) IF THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR CONTRACTS WITH EXPERTS OR
CONSULTANTS UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COST OF THE

SENATE BILL 494 15
CONTRACT SHALL BE PAID BY THE PARTIES TO THE MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION.
(I) (1) IF THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR DENIES OR IMPOSES A CONDITION
ON A MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION, A PERSON THAT IS A PARTY TO THE
TRANSACTION MAY SUBMIT A WRITTEN REQUEST FOR THE COMMISSION TO REVIEW
THE DECISION IN ACCORDANCE WITH REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION.
(2) A DECISION OF THE COMMISSION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE A FINAL DECISION FOR THE PURPOSE OF JUDICIAL REVIEW.
(3) A PERSON THAT IS A PARTY TO THE MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION MAY SEEK JUDICIAL REVIEW IN THE CIRCUIT COURT IN THE COUNTY
WHERE A PARTY TO THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION RESIDES OR HAS A
PRINCIPAL PLACE OF BUSINESS.
(4) A PETITION FOR JUDICIAL REVIEW SHALL BE FILED WITHIN 30
DAYS AFTER THE COMMISSION MAKES THE FINAL DECISION.
(J) THE COMMISSION SHALL MONITOR COMPLIANCE WITH ANY
CONDITIONS PLACED ON A MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION AFTER THE CLOSING
OF THE TRANSACTION.
(K) (1) A PARTY TO A MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION SHALL TIMELY
PROVIDE ANY INFORMATION AND ACCESS TO RECORDS AND FACILITIES THAT IS
NEEDED BY THE COMMISSION TO PERFORM ITS DUTIES UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL SET REASONABLE DEADLINES WHEN
REQUESTING INFORMATION OR ACCESS TO RECORDS OR FACILITIES.
(L) (1) THE COMMISSION MAY REPORT STATISTICAL OR OTHER
INFORMATION THAT IT COLLECTS UNDER THIS SECTION THAT IS NOT PROHIBITED
FROM DISCLOSURE UNDER OTHER LAW.
(2) THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION IS PRESUMED NOT TO BE
CONFIDENTIAL:
(I) THE PARTIES TO A MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION;
(II) THE IDENTITY OF ANY PERSON WITH AT LEAST A 5%
OWNERSHIP INTEREST IN A PARTY TO A MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION;

SENATE BILL 494
(III) THE ANNUAL REVENUE AND VALUE OF ASSETS OF A PARTY
TO A MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION;
(IV) THE MONETARY VALUE OF THE MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION;
(V) WHETHER THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION IS
SUBJECT TO PUBLIC INTEREST REVIEW;
(VI) WHETHER THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR APPROVED,
APPROVED WITH CONDITIONS, OR DENIED THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION;
AND
(VII) ANY CONDITIONS IMPOSED ON A MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION AND A PARTY’S COMPLIANCE WITH THE CONDITIONS.
(3) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 4 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS
ARTICLE, THE COMMISSION MAY NOT DISCLOSE CONFIDENTIAL COMMERCIAL OR
FINANCIAL INFORMATION OR TRADE SECRETS WITHOUT THE CONSENT OF THE
PARTY THAT PRODUCED THE CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION.
(II) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR MAY DISCLOSE INFORMATION
TO ANOTHER STATE AGENCY OR AN EXPERT OR CONSULTANT UNDER CONTRACT
WITH THE COMMISSION IF THE EXPERT, CONSULTANT, OR STATE AGENCY IS BOUND
BY THE SAME CONFIDENTIALITY REQUIREMENTS AS THE COMMISSION.
(M) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER PENALTY IMPOSED BY LAW, THE
COMMISSION MAY:
(1) IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION
THAT MAY NOT EXCEED 1% OF THE VALUE OF THE MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION;
(2) ISSUE AN ADMINISTRATIVE ORDER THAT REQUIRES THE HEALTH
CARE ENTITY TO COMPLY WITH THIS SECTION; OR
(3) APPLY TO THE CIRCUIT COURT IN THE JURISDICTION IN WHICH
THE HEALTH CARE ENTITY IS LOCATED OR, IF THE HEALTH CARE ENTITY IS
OUT–OF–STATE, THE JURISDICTION IN WHICH THE COMMISSION IS LOCATED FOR
LEGAL RELIEF CONSIDERED APPROPRIATE BY THE COMMISSION.

SENATE BILL 494 17
(N) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THIS SECTION.
(2) THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) INCLUDE CRITERIA FOR AN EXPEDITED REVIEW OF A
MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION IF THERE IS AN EMERGENCY AND THE
TRANSACTION IS NEEDED TO ENSURE CONTINUITY OF CARE;
(II) DEFINE PUBLIC INTEREST TO INCLUDE CONSIDERATION
OF:
1. QUALITY;
2. PRICE;
3. HEALTH CARE SERVICE LINE;
4. CONTINUITY OF CARE;
5. ACCESS;
6. STAFFING;
7. EQUITY; AND
8. FINANCIAL STATUS OF THE PARTIES TO THE
TRANSACTION; AND
(III) DESCRIBE THE CONTENTS AND THE FORM AND MANNER OF
DELIVERY OF THE NOTICE REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION TO THE
COMMISSION AND THE PUBLIC.
(3) THE COMMISSION MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING AN
APPROPRIATE FEE TO BE PAID BY A PARTY TO A MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION,
PROPORTIONATE TO THE SIZE OF THE PARTIES TO THE MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION, SUFFICIENT TO REIMBURSE THE COSTS OF ADMINISTERING THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.